Utah statutes.
17B-2a-202.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Ditch" includes a drain or natural or constructed watercourse, whether open, covered, or tiled, and whether inside or outside the drainage district.

(2)  "Drainage" includes the reclamation, protection, or betterment of land by leading, carrying, withholding, or pumping excess water from land through canals, ditches, pipes, or other means.

